Illinois, session 104th, SB1738.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Clerks of Courts Act is amended by changing 5Section 27.1b as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 105/27.1b)7    Sec. 27.1b. Circuit court clerk fees. Notwithstanding any 8other provision of law, all fees charged by the clerks of the 9circuit court for the services described in this Section shall 10be established, collected, and disbursed in accordance with 11this Section. Except as otherwise specified in this Section, 12all fees under this Section shall be paid in advance and 13disbursed by each clerk on a monthly basis. In a county with a 14population of over 3,000,000, units of local government and 15school districts shall not be required to pay fees under this 16Section in advance and the clerk shall instead send an 17itemized bill to the unit of local government or school 18district, within 30 days of the fee being incurred, and the 19unit of local government or school district shall be allowed 20at least 30 days from the date of the itemized bill to pay; 21these payments shall be disbursed by each clerk on a monthly 22basis. Unless otherwise specified in this Section, the amount 23of a fee shall be determined by ordinance or resolution of the   SB1738 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1county board and remitted to the county treasurer to be used 2for purposes related to the operation of the court system in 3the county. In a county with a population of over 3,000,000, 4any amount retained by the clerk of the circuit court or 5remitted to the county treasurer shall be subject to 6appropriation by the county board.7    (a) Civil cases. The fee for filing a complaint, petition, 8or other pleading initiating a civil action shall be as set 9forth in the applicable schedule under this subsection in 10accordance with case categories established by the Supreme 11Court in schedules. 12        (1) SCHEDULE 1: not to exceed a total of $366 in a 13    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 14    exceed $316 in any other county, except as applied to 15    units of local government and school districts in counties 16    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 17    exceed $190 through December 31, 2021 and $184 on and 18    after January 1, 2022. The fees collected under this 19    schedule shall be disbursed as follows:20            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 21        to exceed $55 in a county with a population of 22        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $45 in 23        any other county determined by the clerk with the 24        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 25        automation, court document storage, and administrative 26        purposes.  SB1738 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1            (B) The clerk shall remit up to $21 to the State 2        Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 3        appropriate amounts, in accordance with the clerk's 4        instructions, as follows:5                (i) up to $10, as specified by the Supreme 6            Court in accordance with Part 10A of Article II of 7            the Code of Civil Procedure, into the Mandatory 8            Arbitration Fund;9                (ii) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund; and10                (iii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 11            Purposes Fund.12            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 13        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $290 in a county 14        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 15        not to exceed $250 in any other county, as specified by 16        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 17        for purposes related to the operation of the court 18        system in the county.19        (2) SCHEDULE 2: not to exceed a total of $357 in a 20    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 21    exceed $266 in any other county, except as applied to 22    units of local government and school districts in counties 23    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 24    exceed $190 through December 31, 2021 and $184 on and 25    after January 1, 2022. The fees collected under this 26    schedule shall be disbursed as follows:  SB1738 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 2        to exceed $55 in a county with a population of 3        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $45 in 4        any other county determined by the clerk with the 5        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 6        automation, court document storage, and administrative 7        purposes.8            (B) The clerk shall remit up to $21 to the State 9        Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 10        appropriate amounts, in accordance with the clerk's 11        instructions, as follows:12                (i) up to $10, as specified by the Supreme 13            Court in accordance with Part 10A of Article II of 14            the Code of Civil Procedure, into the Mandatory 15            Arbitration Fund;16                (ii) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund: and17                (iii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 18            Purposes Fund.19            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 20        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $281 in a county 21        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 22        not to exceed $200 in any other county, as specified by 23        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 24        for purposes related to the operation of the court 25        system in the county.26        (3) SCHEDULE 3: not to exceed a total of $265 in a   SB1738 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 2    exceed $89 in any other county, except as applied to units 3    of local government and school districts in counties with 4    more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed 5    $190 through December 31, 2021 and $184 on and after 6    January 1, 2022. The fees collected under this schedule 7    shall be disbursed as follows:8            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 9        to exceed $55 in a county with a population of 10        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $22 in 11        any other county determined by the clerk with the 12        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 13        automation, court document storage, and administrative 14        purposes.15            (B) The clerk shall remit $11 to the State 16        Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 17        appropriate amounts in accordance with the clerk's 18        instructions, as follows:19                (i) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund; and20                (ii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 21            Purposes Fund.22            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 23        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $199 in a county 24        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 25        not to exceed $56 in any other county, as specified by 26        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board,   SB1738 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        for purposes related to the operation of the court 2        system in the county.3        (4) SCHEDULE 4: $0.4    (b) Appearance. The fee for filing an appearance in a 5civil action, including a cannabis civil law action under the 6Cannabis Control Act, shall be as set forth in the applicable 7schedule under this subsection in accordance with case 8categories established by the Supreme Court in schedules.9        (1) SCHEDULE 1: not to exceed a total of $230 in a 10    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 11    exceed $191 in any other county, except as applied to 12    units of local government and school districts in counties 13    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 14    exceed $75. The fees collected under this schedule shall 15    be disbursed as follows:16            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 17        to exceed $50 in a county with a population of 18        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $45 in 19        any other county determined by the clerk with the 20        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court 21        automation, court document storage, and administrative 22        purposes.23            (B) The clerk shall remit up to $21 to the State 24        Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall deposit the 25        appropriate amounts, in accordance with the clerk's 26        instructions, as follows:  SB1738 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1                (i) up to $10, as specified by the Supreme 2            Court in accordance with Part 10A of Article II of 3            the Code of Civil Procedure, into the Mandatory 4            Arbitration Fund;5                (ii) $2 into the Access to Justice Fund; and6                (iii) $9 into the Supreme Court Special 7            Purposes Fund.8            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 9        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $159 in a county 10        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 11        not to exceed $125 in any other county, as specified by 12        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 13        for purposes related to the operation of the court 14        system in the county.15        (2) SCHEDULE 2: not to exceed a total of $130 in a 16    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and not to 17    exceed $109 in any other county, except as applied to 18    units of local government and school districts in counties 19    with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to 20    exceed $75. The fees collected under this schedule shall 21    be disbursed as follows:22            (A) The clerk shall retain a sum, in an amount not 23        to exceed $50 in a county with a population of 24        3,000,000 or more and in an amount not to exceed $10 in 25        any other county determined by the clerk with the 26        approval of the Supreme Court, to be used for court   SB1738 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        automation, court document storage, and administrative 2        purposes.3            (B) The clerk shall remit $9 to the State 4        Treasurer, which the State Treasurer shall deposit 5        into the Supreme Court Special Purposes Fund.6            (C) The clerk shall remit a sum to the County 7        Treasurer, in an amount not to exceed $71 in a county 8        with a population of 3,000,000 or more and in an amount 9        not to exceed $90 in any other county, as specified by 10        ordinance or resolution passed by the county board, 11        for purposes related to the operation of the court 12        system in the county.13        (3) SCHEDULE 3: $0.14    (b-5) Kane County and Will County. In Kane County and Will 15County civil cases, there is an additional fee of up to $30 as 16set by the county board under Section 5-1101.3 of the Counties 17Code to be paid by each party at the time of filing the first 18pleading, paper, or other appearance; provided that no 19additional fee shall be required if more than one party is 20represented in a single pleading, paper, or other appearance. 21Distribution of fees collected under this subsection (b-5) 22shall be as provided in Section 5-1101.3 of the Counties Code. 23    (c) Counterclaim or third party complaint. When any 24defendant files a counterclaim or third party complaint, as 25part of the defendant's answer or otherwise, the defendant 26shall pay a filing fee for each counterclaim or third party   SB1738 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1complaint in an amount equal to the filing fee the defendant 2would have had to pay had the defendant brought a separate 3action for the relief sought in the counterclaim or third 4party complaint, less the amount of the appearance fee, if 5any, that the defendant has already paid in the action in which 6the counterclaim or third party complaint is filed.7    (d) Alias summons. The clerk shall collect a fee not to 8exceed $6 in a county with a population of 3,000,000 or more 9and not to exceed $5 in any other county for each alias summons 10or citation issued by the clerk, except as applied to units of 11local government and school districts in counties with more 12than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed $5 for each 13alias summons or citation issued by the clerk.14    (e) Jury services. The clerk shall collect, in addition to 15other fees allowed by law, a sum not to exceed $212.50, as a 16fee for the services of a jury in every civil action not 17quasi-criminal in its nature and not a proceeding for the 18exercise of the right of eminent domain and in every other 19action wherein the right of trial by jury is or may be given by 20law. The jury fee shall be paid by the party demanding a jury 21at the time of filing the jury demand. If the fee is not paid 22by either party, no jury shall be called in the action or 23proceeding, and the action or proceeding shall be tried by the 24court without a jury.25    (f) Change of venue. In connection with a change of venue:26        (1) The clerk of the jurisdiction from which the case   SB1738 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    is transferred may charge a fee, not to exceed $40, for the 2    preparation and certification of the record; and3        (2) The clerk of the jurisdiction to which the case is 4    transferred may charge the same filing fee as if it were 5    the commencement of a new suit.6    (g) Petition to vacate or modify.7        (1) In a proceeding involving a petition to vacate or 8    modify any final judgment or order filed within 30 days 9    after the judgment or order was entered, except for an 10    eviction case, small claims case, petition to reopen an 11    estate, petition to modify, terminate, or enforce a 12    judgment or order for child or spousal support, or 13    petition to modify, suspend, or terminate an order for 14    withholding, the fee shall not exceed $60 in a county with 15    a population of 3,000,000 or more and shall not exceed $50 16    in any other county, except as applied to units of local 17    government and school districts in counties with more than 18    3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed $50.19        (2) In a proceeding involving a petition to vacate or 20    modify any final judgment or order filed more than 30 days 21    after the judgment or order was entered, except for a 22    petition to modify, terminate, or enforce a judgment or 23    order for child or spousal support, or petition to modify, 24    suspend, or terminate an order for withholding, the fee 25    shall not exceed $75.26        (3) In a proceeding involving a motion to vacate or   SB1738 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    amend a final order, motion to vacate an ex parte 2    judgment, judgment of forfeiture, or "failure to appear" 3    or "failure to comply" notices sent to the Secretary of 4    State, the fee shall equal $40.5    (h) Appeals preparation. The fee for preparation of a 6record on appeal shall be based on the number of pages, as 7follows:8        (1) if the record contains no more than 100 pages, the 9    fee shall not exceed $70 in a county with a population of 10    3,000,000 or more and shall not exceed $50 in any other 11    county;12        (2) if the record contains between 100 and 200 pages, 13    the fee shall not exceed $100; and14        (3) if the record contains 200 or more pages, the 15    clerk may collect an additional fee not to exceed 25 cents 16    per page.17    (i) Remands. In any cases remanded to the circuit court 18from the Supreme Court or the appellate court for a new trial, 19the clerk shall reinstate the case with either its original 20number or a new number. The clerk shall not charge any new or 21additional fee for the reinstatement. Upon reinstatement, the 22clerk shall advise the parties of the reinstatement. Parties 23shall have the same right to a jury trial on remand and 24reinstatement that they had before the appeal, and no 25additional or new fee or charge shall be made for a jury trial 26after remand.  SB1738 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    (j) Garnishment, wage deduction, and citation. In 2garnishment affidavit, wage deduction affidavit, and citation 3petition proceedings:4        (1) if the amount in controversy in the proceeding is 5    not more than $1,000, the fee may not exceed $35 in a 6    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and may not 7    exceed $15 in any other county, except as applied to units 8    of local government and school districts in counties with 9    more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed 10    $15;11        (2) if the amount in controversy in the proceeding is 12    greater than $1,000 and not more than $5,000, the fee may 13    not exceed $45 in a county with a population of 3,000,000 14    or more and may not exceed $30 in any other county, except 15    as applied to units of local government and school 16    districts in counties with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants 17    an amount not to exceed $30; and18        (3) if the amount in controversy in the proceeding is 19    greater than $5,000, the fee may not exceed $65 in a county 20    with a population of 3,000,000 or more and may not exceed 21    $50 in any other county, except as applied to units of 22    local government and school districts in counties with 23    more than 3,000,000 inhabitants an amount not to exceed 24    $50.25    (j-5) Debt collection. In any proceeding to collect a debt 26subject to the exception in item (ii) of subparagraph (A-5) of   SB1738 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1paragraph (1) of subsection (z) of this Section, the circuit 2court shall order and the clerk shall collect from each 3judgment debtor a fee of: 4        (1) $35 if the amount in controversy in the proceeding 5    is not more than $1,000;6        (2) $45 if the amount in controversy in the proceeding 7    is greater than $1,000 and not more than $5,000; and 8        (3) $65 if the amount in controversy in the proceeding 9    is greater than $5,000. 10    (k) Collections.11        (1) For all collections made of others, except the 12    State and county and except in maintenance or child 13    support cases, the clerk may collect a fee of up to 2.5% of 14    the amount collected and turned over.15        (2) In child support and maintenance cases, the clerk 16    may collect an annual fee of up to $36 from the person 17    making payment for maintaining child support records and 18    the processing of support orders to the State of Illinois 19    KIDS system and the recording of payments issued by the 20    State Disbursement Unit for the official record of the 21    Court. This fee is in addition to and separate from 22    amounts ordered to be paid as maintenance or child support 23    and shall be deposited into a Separate Maintenance and 24    Child Support Collection Fund, of which the clerk shall be 25    the custodian, ex officio, to be used by the clerk to 26    maintain child support orders and record all payments   SB1738 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    issued by the State Disbursement Unit for the official 2    record of the Court. The clerk may recover from the person 3    making the maintenance or child support payment any 4    additional cost incurred in the collection of this annual 5    fee.6        (3) The clerk may collect a fee of $5 for 7    certifications made to the Secretary of State as provided 8    in Section 7-703 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and this 9    fee shall be deposited into the Separate Maintenance and 10    Child Support Collection Fund.11        (4) In proceedings to foreclose the lien of delinquent 12    real estate taxes, State's Attorneys shall receive a fee 13    of 10% of the total amount realized from the sale of real 14    estate sold in the proceedings. The clerk shall collect 15    the fee from the total amount realized from the sale of the 16    real estate sold in the proceedings and remit to the 17    County Treasurer to be credited to the earnings of the 18    Office of the State's Attorney. 19    (l) Mailing. The fee for the clerk mailing documents shall 20not exceed $10 plus the cost of postage.21    (m) Certified copies. The fee for each certified copy of a 22judgment, after the first copy, shall not exceed $10.23    (n) Certification, authentication, and reproduction.24        (1) The fee for each certification or authentication 25    for taking the acknowledgment of a deed or other 26    instrument in writing with the seal of office shall not   SB1738 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    exceed $6.2        (2) The fee for reproduction of any document contained 3    in the clerk's files shall not exceed:4            (A) $2 for the first page;5            (B) 50 cents per page for the next 19 pages; and6            (C) 25 cents per page for all additional pages.7    (o) Record search. For each record search, within a 8division or municipal district, the clerk may collect a search 9fee not to exceed $6 for each year searched.10    (p) Hard copy. For each page of hard copy print output, 11when case records are maintained on an automated medium, the 12clerk may collect a fee not to exceed $10 in a county with a 13population of 3,000,000 or more and not to exceed $6 in any 14other county, except as applied to units of local government 15and school districts in counties with more than 3,000,000 16inhabitants an amount not to exceed $6.17    (q) Index inquiry and other records. No fee shall be 18charged for a single plaintiff and defendant index inquiry or 19single case record inquiry when this request is made in person 20and the records are maintained in a current automated medium, 21and when no hard copy print output is requested. The fees to be 22charged for management records, multiple case records, and 23multiple journal records may be specified by the Chief Judge 24pursuant to the guidelines for access and dissemination of 25information approved by the Supreme Court.26    (r) Performing a marriage. There shall be a $10 fee for   SB1738 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1performing a marriage in court.2    (s) Voluntary assignment. For filing each deed of 3voluntary assignment, the clerk shall collect a fee not to 4exceed $20. For recording a deed of voluntary assignment, the 5clerk shall collect a fee not to exceed 50 cents for each 100 6words. Exceptions filed to claims presented to an assignee of 7a debtor who has made a voluntary assignment for the benefit of 8creditors shall be considered and treated, for the purpose of 9taxing costs therein, as actions in which the party or parties 10filing the exceptions shall be considered as party or parties 11plaintiff, and the claimant or claimants as party or parties 12defendant, and those parties respectively shall pay to the 13clerk the same fees as provided by this Section to be paid in 14other actions.15    (t) Expungement petition. Except as provided in Sections 161-19 and 5-915 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the clerk may 17collect a fee not to exceed $60 for each expungement petition 18filed and an additional fee not to exceed $4 for each certified 19copy of an order to expunge arrest records.20    (u) Transcripts of judgment. For the filing of a 21transcript of judgment, the clerk may collect the same fee as 22if it were the commencement of a new suit.23    (v) Probate filings.24        (1) For each account (other than one final account) 25    filed in the estate of a decedent, or ward, the fee shall 26    not exceed $25.  SB1738 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        (2) For filing a claim in an estate when the amount 2    claimed is greater than $150 and not more than $500, the 3    fee shall not exceed $40 in a county with a population of 4    3,000,000 or more and shall not exceed $25 in any other 5    county; when the amount claimed is greater than $500 and 6    not more than $10,000, the fee shall not exceed $55 in a 7    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and shall 8    not exceed $40 in any other county; and when the amount 9    claimed is more than $10,000, the fee shall not exceed $75 10    in a county with a population of 3,000,000 or more and 11    shall not exceed $60 in any other county; except the court 12    in allowing a claim may add to the amount allowed the 13    filing fee paid by the claimant.14        (3) For filing in an estate a claim, petition, or 15    supplemental proceeding based upon an action seeking 16    equitable relief including the construction or contest of 17    a will, enforcement of a contract to make a will, and 18    proceedings involving testamentary trusts or the 19    appointment of testamentary trustees, the fee shall not 20    exceed $60.21        (4) There shall be no fee for filing in an estate: (i) 22    the appearance of any person for the purpose of consent; 23    or (ii) the appearance of an executor, administrator, 24    administrator to collect, guardian, guardian ad litem, or 25    special administrator.26        (5) For each jury demand, the fee shall not exceed   SB1738 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    $137.50.2        (6) For each certified copy of letters of office, of 3    court order, or other certification, the fee shall not 4    exceed $2 per page.5        (7) For each exemplification, the fee shall not exceed 6    $2, plus the fee for certification.7        (8) The executor, administrator, guardian, petitioner, 8    or other interested person or his or her attorney shall 9    pay the cost of publication by the clerk directly to the 10    newspaper.11        (9) The person on whose behalf a charge is incurred 12    for witness, court reporter, appraiser, or other 13    miscellaneous fees shall pay the same directly to the 14    person entitled thereto.15        (10) The executor, administrator, guardian, 16    petitioner, or other interested person or his or her 17    attorney shall pay to the clerk all postage charges 18    incurred by the clerk in mailing petitions, orders, 19    notices, or other documents pursuant to the provisions of 20    the Probate Act of 1975.21    (w) Corrections of numbers. For correction of the case 22number, case title, or attorney computer identification 23number, if required by rule of court, on any document filed in 24the clerk's office, to be charged against the party that filed 25the document, the fee shall not exceed $25.26    (x) Miscellaneous.  SB1738 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        (1) Interest earned on any fees collected by the clerk 2    shall be turned over to the county general fund as an 3    earning of the office.4        (2) For any check, draft, or other bank instrument 5    returned to the clerk for non-sufficient funds, account 6    closed, or payment stopped, the clerk shall collect a fee 7    of $25.8    (y) Other fees. Any fees not covered in this Section shall 9be set by rule or administrative order of the circuit court 10with the approval of the Administrative Office of the Illinois 11Courts. The clerk of the circuit court may provide services in 12connection with the operation of the clerk's office, other 13than those services mentioned in this Section, as may be 14requested by the public and agreed to by the clerk and approved 15by the Chief Judge. Any charges for additional services shall 16be as agreed to between the clerk and the party making the 17request and approved by the Chief Judge. Nothing in this 18subsection shall be construed to require any clerk to provide 19any service not otherwise required by law.20    (y-5) Unpaid fees. Unless a court ordered payment schedule 21is implemented or the fee requirements of this Section are 22waived under a court order, the clerk of the circuit court may 23add to any unpaid fees and costs under this Section a 24delinquency amount equal to 5% of the unpaid fees that remain 25unpaid after 30 days, 10% of the unpaid fees that remain unpaid 26after 60 days, and 15% of the unpaid fees that remain unpaid   SB1738 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1after 90 days. Notice to those parties may be made by signage 2posting or publication. The additional delinquency amounts 3collected under this Section shall be deposited into the 4Circuit Court Clerk Operations and Administration Fund and 5used to defray additional administrative costs incurred by the 6clerk of the circuit court in collecting unpaid fees and 7costs. 8    (z) Exceptions.9        (1) No fee authorized by this Section shall apply to:10            (A) police departments or other law enforcement 11        agencies. In this Section, "law enforcement agency" 12        means: an agency of the State or agency of a unit of 13        local government which is vested by law or ordinance 14        with the duty to maintain public order and to enforce 15        criminal laws or ordinances; the Attorney General; or 16        any State's Attorney;17            (A-5) any unit of local government or school 18        district, except in counties having a population of 19        500,000 or more the county board may by resolution set 20        fees for units of local government or school districts 21        no greater than the minimum fees applicable in 22        counties with a population less than 3,000,000; 23        provided however, no fee may be charged to any unit of 24        local government or school district in connection with 25        any action which, in whole or in part, is: (i) to 26        enforce an ordinance; (ii) to collect a debt; or (iii)   SB1738 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        under the Administrative Review Law; 2            (B) any action instituted by the corporate 3        authority of a municipality with more than 1,000,000 4        inhabitants under Section 11-31-1 of the Illinois 5        Municipal Code and any action instituted under 6        subsection (b) of Section 11-31-1 of the Illinois 7        Municipal Code by a private owner or tenant of real 8        property within 1,200 feet of a dangerous or unsafe 9        building seeking an order compelling the owner or 10        owners of the building to take any of the actions 11        authorized under that subsection;12            (C) any commitment petition or petition for an 13        order authorizing the administration of psychotropic 14        medication or electroconvulsive therapy under the 15        Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code;16            (D) a petitioner in any order of protection 17        proceeding, including, but not limited to, fees for 18        filing, modifying, withdrawing, certifying, or 19        photocopying petitions for orders of protection, 20        issuing alias summons, any related filing service, or 21        certifying, modifying, vacating, or photocopying any 22        orders of protection;23            (E) proceedings for the appointment of a 24        confidential intermediary under the Adoption Act;25            (F) a minor subject to Article III, IV, or V of the 26        Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the minor's parent,   SB1738 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        guardian, or legal custodian; or2            (G) a minor under the age of 18 transferred to 3        adult court or excluded from juvenile court 4        jurisdiction under Article V of the Juvenile Court Act 5        of 1987, or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal 6        custodian. 7        (2) No fee other than the filing fee contained in the 8    applicable schedule in subsection (a) shall be charged to 9    any person in connection with an adoption proceeding.10        (3) Upon good cause shown, the court may waive any 11    fees associated with a special needs adoption. The term 12    "special needs adoption" has the meaning provided by the 13    Illinois Department of Children and Family Services.14        (4) No fee may be charged for the filing of an 15    appearance by any defendant in a small claim proceeding. 16    As used in this Section, "small claim" means a proceeding 17    as defined in Supreme Court Rule 281. 18(Source: P.A. 102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-278, eff. 8-6-21; 19102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-4, eff. 205-31-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 21    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 22changing Sections 2-1402, 2-1602, 12-108, 12-705, 12-707, 2312-708, 12-901, 12-904, 12-906, 12-909, 12-910, 12-911, 2412-912, 12-1001, and 13-218 and by adding Sections 2-1402.1, 2512-705.1, and 12-1001.1 as follows:   SB1738 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    (735 ILCS 5/2-1402)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-1402)2    Sec. 2-1402. Citations to discover assets. 3    (a) A judgment creditor, or his or her successor in 4interest when that interest is made to appear of record, is 5entitled to prosecute citations to discover assets for the 6purposes of examining the judgment debtor or any other person 7to discover assets or income of the debtor not exempt from the 8enforcement of the judgment, a deduction order or garnishment, 9and of compelling the application of non-exempt assets or 10income discovered toward the payment of the amount due under 11the judgment. A citation proceeding shall be commenced by the 12service of a citation issued by the clerk. The procedure for 13conducting citation proceedings shall be prescribed by rules. 14All citations issued by the clerk shall have the following 15language, or language substantially similar thereto, stated 16prominently on the front, in capital letters: "IF YOU FAIL TO 17APPEAR IN COURT AS DIRECTED IN THIS NOTICE, (1) YOU MAY LOSE 18YOUR RIGHT TO PROTECT MONEY IN YOUR BANK, SAVINGS BANK, OR 19CREDIT UNION AND OTHER ASSETS, AND (2) YOU MAY BE ARRESTED AND 20BROUGHT BEFORE THE COURT TO ANSWER TO A CHARGE OF CONTEMPT OF 21COURT, WHICH MAY BE PUNISHABLE BY IMPRISONMENT IN THE COUNTY 22JAIL." The court shall not grant a continuance of the citation 23proceeding except upon good cause shown.24    (b) Any citation served upon a judgment debtor or any 25other person shall include a certification by the attorney for   SB1738 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1the judgment creditor or the judgment creditor setting forth 2the amount of the judgment, that the judgment is a consumer 3debt judgment if it qualifies as a consumer debt judgment 4under paragraph (b)(1) of Section 2-1303, the date of the 5judgment, or its revival date, the balance due thereon, the 6name of the court, and the number of the case, and a copy of 7the citation notice required by this subsection. Whenever a 8citation is served upon a person or party other than the 9judgment debtor, the officer or person serving the citation 10shall send to the judgment debtor, within three business days 11of the service upon the cited party, a copy of the citation and 12the citation notice, which may be sent by regular first-class 13mail to the judgment debtor's last known address. In no event 14shall a citation hearing be held sooner than five business 15days after the mailing of the citation and citation notice to 16the judgment debtor, except by agreement of the parties. The 17citation notice need not be mailed to a corporation, 18partnership, or association. The citation notice shall be in 19substantially the following form:20"CITATION NOTICE21        (Name and address of Court) 22        Name of Case: (Name of Judgment Creditor), 23            Judgment Creditor v. 24            (Name of Judgment Debtor), 25            Judgment Debtor. 26        Address of Judgment Debtor: (Insert last known SB1738 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1            address) 2        Name and address of Attorney for Judgment 3            Creditor or of Judgment Creditor (If no 4            attorney is listed): (Insert name and address) 5        Amount of Judgment: $ (Insert amount) 6        Name of Person Receiving Citation: (Insert name) 7        Court Date and Time: (Insert return date and time 8            specified in citation)9    NOTICE: The court has issued a citation against the person 10named above. IF THE PERSON FAILS TO APPEAR IN COURT AT THE DATE 11AND TIME PROVIDED, THE PERSON MAY LOSE THE RIGHT TO PROTECT 12MONEY IN A BANK, SAVINGS BANK, OR CREDIT UNION ACCOUNT AND 13OTHER ASSETS AND COULD BE SUBJECT TO ARREST AND IMPRISONMENT. 14The citation directs that person to appear in court to be 15examined for the purpose of allowing the judgment creditor to 16discover income and assets belonging to the judgment debtor or 17in which the judgment debtor has an interest. The citation was 18issued on the basis of a judgment against the judgment debtor 19in favor of the judgment creditor in the amount stated above. 20On or after the court date stated above, the court may compel 21the application of any discovered income or assets toward 22payment on the judgment.23    The amount of income or assets that may be applied toward 24the judgment is limited by federal and Illinois law. The 25JUDGMENT DEBTOR HAS THE RIGHT TO ASSERT STATUTORY EXEMPTIONS 26AGAINST CERTAIN INCOME OR ASSETS OF THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR WHICH   SB1738 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1MAY NOT BE USED TO SATISFY THE JUDGMENT IN THE AMOUNT STATED 2ABOVE:3        (1) Under Illinois or federal law, the exemptions of 4    personal property owned by the debtor include the debtor's 5    equity interest, not to exceed $4,000 in value, in any 6    personal property as chosen by the debtor, of which $1,000 7    will be automatically applied to a debtor's bank, savings 8    bank, or credit union account through the end of the 9    hearing noted above; Social Security and SSI benefits; 10    public assistance benefits; unemployment compensation 11    benefits; worker's compensation benefits; veteran's 12    benefits; circuit breaker property tax relief benefits; 13    the debtor's equity interest, not to exceed $3,600 $2,400 14    in value, in any one motor vehicle, and the debtor's 15    equity interest, not to exceed $2,250 $1,500 in value, in 16    any implements, professional books, or tools of the trade 17    of the debtor.18        (2) Under Illinois law, every person is entitled to an 19    estate in homestead, when it is owned and occupied as a 20    residence, to the extent in value of $50,000 for an 21    individual and $100,000 for two or more individual owners 22    $15,000, which homestead is exempt from judgment.23        (3) Under Illinois law, the amount of wages that may 24    be applied toward a judgment is limited to the lesser of 25    (i) 15% of gross weekly wages or (ii) the amount by which 26    disposable earnings for a week exceed the total of 45   SB1738 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    times the federal minimum hourly wage or, under a wage 2    deduction summons served on or after January 1, 2006, the 3    Illinois minimum hourly wage, whichever is greater.4        (4) Under federal law, the amount of wages that may be 5    applied toward a judgment is limited to the lesser of (i) 6    25% of disposable earnings for a week or (ii) the amount by 7    which disposable earnings for a week exceed 30 times the 8    federal minimum hourly wage.9        (5) Pension and retirement benefits and refunds may be 10    claimed as exempt under Illinois law.11    The judgment debtor may have other possible exemptions 12under the law.13    THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR HAS THE RIGHT AT THE CITATION HEARING 14TO DECLARE EXEMPT CERTAIN INCOME OR ASSETS OR BOTH. The 15judgment debtor also has the right to seek a declaration at an 16earlier date, by notifying the clerk in writing at (insert 17address of clerk). When so notified, the Clerk of the Court 18will obtain a prompt hearing date from the court and will 19provide the necessary forms that must be prepared by the 20judgment debtor or the attorney for the judgment debtor and 21sent to the judgment creditor and the judgment creditor's 22attorney regarding the time and location of the hearing. This 23notice may be sent by regular first class mail."24    (b-1) Any citation served upon a judgment debtor who is a 25natural person shall be served by personal service or abode 26service as provided in Supreme Court Rule 105 and shall   SB1738 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1include a copy of the Income and Asset Form set forth in 2subsection (b-5). 3    (b-5) The Income and Asset Form required to be served by 4the judgment creditor in subsection (b-1) shall be in 5substantially the following form:  6INCOME AND ASSET FORM 7        To Judgment Debtor: Please complete this form and 8    bring it with you to the hearing referenced in the 9    enclosed citation notice. You should also bring to the 10    hearing any documents you have to support the information 11    you provide in this form, such as pay stubs and account 12    statements. The information you provide will help the 13    court determine whether you have any property or income 14    that can be used to satisfy the judgment entered against 15    you in this matter. The information you provide must be 16    accurate to the best of your knowledge.17        If you fail to appear at this hearing, you could be 18    held in contempt of court and possibly arrested.19        In answer to the citation proceedings served upon the 20    judgment debtor, he or she answers as follows:  21        Name:.....................22        Home Phone Number:.................23        Home Address:....................24        Date of Birth:......................  SB1738 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        Marital Status:..................... 2        I have.........dependents.3        Do you have a job? YES NO4        Company's name I work for:......................5        Company's address:..............................  6        Job:7            I earn $....... per.......8            If self employed, list here your business name and 9        address:10            .............................................11            Income from self employment is $......... per 12        year.13            I have the following benefits with my employer:14            .............................................15        I do not have a job, but I support myself through:16            Government Assistance $........ per month17            Unemployment $........ per month18            Social Security $........ per month19            SSI $........ per month20            Pension $........ per month21            Other $........ per month22        Real Estate: 23        Do you own any real estate? YES NO24        I own real estate at.........., with names of other 25    owners  SB1738 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        .................................................2        Additional real estate I own:....................3        I have a beneficial interest in a land trust. The name 4    and address of the trustee is:............. The beneficial 5    interest is listed in my name and........................6        There is a mortgage on my real estate. State the 7    mortgage company's name and address for each parcel of 8    real estate owned:9        .................................................10        An assignment of beneficial interest in the land trust 11    was signed to secure a loan from.........................12        I have the following accounts:13            Checking account at ..........; 14              account balance $...... 15            Savings account at ..........; 16              account balance $...... 17            Money market or certificate of deposit at....18            Safe deposit box at..........................19            Other accounts (please identify):............20        I own:21            A vehicle (state year, make, model, and VIN):.22            Jewelry (please specify):....................23        Other property described as:......................24            Stocks/Bonds.....................25            Personal computer................26            DVD player.......................  SB1738 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1            Television.......................2            Stove.......................3            Microwave.......................4            Work tools.......................5            Business equipment.......................6            Farm equipment.......................7            Other property (please specify):8            .............................................9        Signature:.................... 10    (b-10) Any action properly initiated under this Section 11may proceed notwithstanding an absent or incomplete Income and 12Asset Form, and a judgment debtor may be examined for the 13purpose of allowing the judgment creditor to discover income 14and assets belonging to the judgment debtor or in which the 15judgment debtor has an interest. 16    (c) When assets or income of the judgment debtor not 17exempt from the satisfaction of a judgment, a deduction order 18or garnishment are discovered, the court may, by appropriate 19order or judgment:20        (1) Compel the judgment debtor to deliver up, to be 21    applied in satisfaction of the judgment, in whole or in 22    part, money, choses in action, property or effects in his 23    or her possession or control, so discovered, capable of 24    delivery and to which his or her title or right of 25    possession is not substantially disputed.26        (2) Compel the judgment debtor to pay to the judgment   SB1738 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    creditor or apply on the judgment, in installments, a 2    portion of his or her income, however or whenever earned 3    or acquired, as the court may deem proper, having due 4    regard for the reasonable requirements of the judgment 5    debtor and his or her family, if dependent upon him or her, 6    as well as any payments required to be made by prior order 7    of court or under wage assignments outstanding; provided 8    that the judgment debtor shall not be compelled to pay 9    income which would be considered exempt as wages under the 10    Wage Deduction Statute. The court may modify an order for 11    installment payments, from time to time, upon application 12    of either party upon notice to the other.13        (3) Compel any person cited, other than the judgment 14    debtor, to deliver up any assets so discovered, to be 15    applied in satisfaction of the judgment, in whole or in 16    part, when those assets are held under such circumstances 17    that in an action by the judgment debtor he or she could 18    recover them in specie or obtain a judgment for the 19    proceeds or value thereof as for conversion or 20    embezzlement. A judgment creditor may recover a corporate 21    judgment debtor's property on behalf of the judgment 22    debtor for use of the judgment creditor by filing an 23    appropriate petition within the citation proceedings. 24        (4) Enter any order upon or judgment against the 25    person cited that could be entered in any garnishment 26    proceeding.  SB1738 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        (5) Compel any person cited to execute an assignment 2    of any chose in action or a conveyance of title to real or 3    personal property or resign memberships in exchanges, 4    clubs, or other entities in the same manner and to the same 5    extent as a court could do in any proceeding by a judgment 6    creditor to enforce payment of a judgment or in aid of the 7    enforcement of a judgment.8        (6) Authorize the judgment creditor to maintain an 9    action against any person or corporation that, it appears 10    upon proof satisfactory to the court, is indebted to the 11    judgment debtor, for the recovery of the debt, forbid the 12    transfer or other disposition of the debt until an action 13    can be commenced and prosecuted to judgment, direct that 14    the papers or proof in the possession or control of the 15    debtor and necessary in the prosecution of the action be 16    delivered to the creditor or impounded in court, and 17    provide for the disposition of any moneys in excess of the 18    sum required to pay the judgment creditor's judgment and 19    costs allowed by the court.20    (c-5) If a citation is directed to a judgment debtor who is 21a natural person, no payment order shall be entered under 22subsection (c) unless the Income and Asset Form was served 23upon the judgment debtor as required by subsection (b-1), the 24judgment debtor has had an opportunity to assert exemptions, 25and the payments are from non-exempt sources. 26    (d) No order or judgment shall be entered under subsection   SB1738 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1(c) in favor of the judgment creditor unless there appears of 2record a certification of mailing showing that a copy of the 3citation and a copy of the citation notice was mailed to the 4judgment debtor as required by subsection (b).5    (d-5) If upon examination the court determines that the 6judgment debtor does not possess any non-exempt income or 7assets, then the citation shall be dismissed. 8    (e) All property ordered to be delivered up shall, except 9as otherwise provided in this Section, be delivered to the 10sheriff to be collected by the sheriff or sold at public sale 11and the proceeds thereof applied towards the payment of costs 12and the satisfaction of the judgment. If the judgment debtor's 13property is of such a nature that it is not readily delivered 14up to the sheriff for public sale or if another method of sale 15is more appropriate to liquidate the property or enhance its 16value at sale, the court may order the sale of such property by 17the debtor, third party respondent, or by a selling agent 18other than the sheriff upon such terms as are just and 19equitable. The proceeds of sale, after deducting reasonable 20and necessary expenses, are to be turned over to the creditor 21and applied to the balance due on the judgment. 22    (f)(1) The citation may prohibit the party to whom it is 23directed from making or allowing any transfer or other 24disposition of, or interfering with, any property not exempt 25from the enforcement of a judgment therefrom, a deduction 26order or garnishment, belonging to the judgment debtor or to   SB1738 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1which he or she may be entitled or which may thereafter be 2acquired by or become due to him or her, and from paying over 3or otherwise disposing of any moneys not so exempt which are 4due or to become due to the judgment debtor, until the further 5order of the court or the termination of the proceeding, 6whichever occurs first. The third party may not be obliged to 7withhold the payment of any moneys beyond double the amount of 8the balance due sought to be enforced by the judgment 9creditor, subject to Section 12-1001.(d). The court may punish 10any party who violates the restraining provision of a citation 11as and for a contempt, or if the party is a third party may 12enter judgment against him or her in the amount of the unpaid 13portion of the judgment and costs allowable under this 14Section, or in the amount of the value of the property 15transferred, whichever is lesser. 16    (2) The court may enjoin any person, whether or not a party 17to the citation proceeding, from making or allowing any 18transfer or other disposition of, or interference with, the 19property of the judgment debtor not exempt from the 20enforcement of a judgment, a deduction order or garnishment, 21or the property or debt not so exempt concerning which any 22person is required to attend and be examined until further 23direction in the premises. The injunction order shall remain 24in effect until vacated by the court or until the proceeding is 25terminated, whichever first occurs.26    (g) If it appears that any property, chose in action,   SB1738 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1credit or effect discovered, or any interest therein, is 2claimed by any person, the court shall, as in garnishment 3proceedings, permit or require the claimant to appear and 4maintain his or her right. The rights of the person cited and 5the rights of any adverse claimant shall be asserted and 6determined pursuant to the law relating to garnishment 7proceedings.8    (h) Costs in proceedings authorized by this Section shall 9be allowed, assessed and paid in accordance with rules, 10provided that if the court determines, in its discretion, that 11costs incurred by the judgment creditor were improperly 12incurred, those costs shall be paid by the judgment creditor.13    (i) This Section is in addition to and does not affect 14enforcement of judgments or citation proceedings thereto, by 15any other methods now or hereafter provided by law.16    (j) This Section does not grant the power to any court to 17order installment or other payments from, or compel the sale, 18delivery, surrender, assignment or conveyance of any property 19exempt by statute from the enforcement of a judgment thereon, 20a deduction order, garnishment, attachment, sequestration, 21process or other levy or seizure.22    (k) (Blank).23    (k-3) The court may enter any order upon or judgment 24against the respondent cited that could be entered in any 25garnishment proceeding under Part 7 of Article XII of this 26Code. This subsection (k-3) shall be construed as being   SB1738 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1declarative of existing law and not as a new enactment.2    (k-5) If the court determines that any property held by a 3third party respondent is wages pursuant to Section 12-801, 4the court shall proceed as if a wage deduction proceeding had 5been filed and proceed to enter such necessary and proper 6orders as would have been entered in a wage deduction 7proceeding including but not limited to the granting of the 8statutory exemptions allowed by Section 12-803 and all other 9remedies allowed plaintiff and defendant pursuant to Part 8 of 10Article 12 of this Act. 11    (k-10) If a creditor discovers personal property of the 12judgment debtor that is subject to the lien of a citation to 13discover assets, the creditor may have the court impress a 14lien against a specific item of personal property, including a 15beneficial interest in a land trust. The lien survives the 16termination of the citation proceedings and remains as a lien 17against the personal property in the same manner that a 18judgment lien recorded against real property pursuant to 19Section 12-101 remains a lien on real property. If the 20judgment is revived before dormancy, the lien shall remain. A 21lien against personal property may, but need not, be recorded 22in the office of the recorder or filed as an informational 23filing pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code. 24    (l) At any citation hearing at which the judgment debtor 25appears and seeks a declaration that certain of his or her 26income or assets are exempt, the court shall proceed to   SB1738 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1determine whether the property which the judgment debtor 2declares to be exempt is exempt from judgment. At any time 3before the return date specified on the citation, the judgment 4debtor may request, in writing, a hearing to declare exempt 5certain income and assets by notifying the clerk of the court 6before that time, using forms as may be provided by the clerk 7of the court. The clerk of the court will obtain a prompt 8hearing date from the court and will provide the necessary 9forms that must be prepared by the judgment debtor or the 10attorney for the judgment debtor and sent to the judgment 11creditor, or the judgment creditor's attorney, regarding the 12time and location of the hearing. This notice may be sent by 13regular first class mail. At the hearing, the court shall 14immediately, unless for good cause shown that the hearing is 15to be continued, shall proceed to determine whether the 16property which the judgment debtor declares to be exempt is 17exempt from judgment. The restraining provisions of subsection 18(f) shall not apply to any property determined by the court to 19be exempt.20    (m) The judgment or balance due on the judgment becomes a 21lien when a citation is served in accordance with subsection 22(a) of this Section, subject to subsection (c) of Section 2312-1001.1. The lien binds nonexempt personal property, 24including money, choses in action, and effects of the judgment 25debtor as follows:26        (1) When the citation is directed against the judgment   SB1738 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    debtor, upon all personal property belonging to the 2    judgment debtor in the possession or control of the 3    judgment debtor or which may thereafter be acquired or 4    come due to the judgment debtor to the time of the 5    disposition of the citation.6        (2) When the citation is directed against a third 7    party, upon all personal property belonging to the 8    judgment debtor in the possession or control of the third 9    party or which thereafter may be acquired or come due the 10    judgment debtor and comes into the possession or control 11    of the third party to the time of the disposition of the 12    citation.13    The lien established under this Section does not affect 14the rights of citation respondents in property prior to the 15service of the citation upon them and does not affect the 16rights of bona fide purchasers or lenders without notice of 17the citation. The rights of citation respondents in property 18belonging to the judgment debtor in the possession or control 19of the citation respondent are not affected, impaired, or 20abridged by the automatic exemption defined in Section 2112-1001.1. The lien is effective for the period specified by 22Supreme Court Rule.23    This subsection (m), as added by Public Act 88-48, is a 24declaration of existing law.25    (n) If any provision of this Act or its application to any 26person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that   SB1738 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1provision or application does not affect the provisions or 2applications of the Act that can be given effect without the 3invalid provision or application.4    (o) The changes to this Section made by this amendatory 5Act of the 97th General Assembly apply only to citation 6proceedings commenced under this Section on or after the 7effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 8Assembly. The requirements or limitations set forth in 9subsections (b-1), (b-5), (b-10), (c-5), and (d-5) do not 10apply to the enforcement of any order or judgment resulting 11from an adjudication of a municipal ordinance violation that 12is subject to Supreme Court Rules 570 through 579, or from an 13administrative adjudication of such an ordinance violation. 14(Source: P.A. 101-191, eff. 8-2-19.) 15    (735 ILCS 5/2-1402.1 new)16    Sec. 2-1402.1. Automatic exemption. When a consumer debt 17judgment, as defined in paragraph (b)(1) of Section 2-1303, 18has been entered against a judgment debtor, the debtor is 19entitled to a $1,000 automatic exemption, as defined in 20Section 12-1001.1. A citation respondent's written answer 21shall set forth all the judgment debtor's personal property in 22its possession, even if it is not in excess of $1,000. 23    (735 ILCS 5/2-1602)24    Sec. 2-1602. Revival of judgment.   SB1738 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    (a) Except as provided in subsections subsection (a-5) and 2(a-10), a judgment may be revived by filing a petition to 3revive the judgment in the seventh year after its entry, or in 4the seventh year after its last revival, or in the twentieth 5year after its entry, or at any other time within 20 years 6after its entry if the judgment becomes dormant and by serving 7the petition and entering a court order for revival as 8provided in the following subsections. The provisions of this 9amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly are declarative of 10existing law.11    (a-5) As used in this Section: A consumer debt judgment as 12defined in subsection (b) of Section 2-1303 may be revived by 13filing a petition to revive the consumer debt judgment no 14later than 10 years after its entry and by serving the petition 15and entering a court order for revival as provided in this 16Section.17        (1) "Consumer debt" means money or property, or the 18    equivalent, due or owing, or alleged to be due or owing, 19    from a natural person by reason of a transaction in which 20    property, services, or money is acquired by that natural 21    person for personal, family, or household purposes. 22        (2) "Consumer debt judgment" means a judgment 23    recovered in any court against one or more natural persons 24    arising out of a consumer debt. "Consumer debt judgment" 25    does not include any compensation for bodily injury or 26    death, nor any judgment entered if the debt is guaranteed   SB1738 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    by or contains a joint and several liability provision 2    between a natural person and a business, whether or not 3    that business is legally constituted under the laws of 4    this State or any other state.5    (a-10) The following revival standards apply to judgments 6relating to consumer debt that were entered prior to January 71, 2020, and consumer debt judgments:8        (1) A judgment relating to consumer debt entered 9    before January 1, 2020 is not a consumer debt judgment and 10    may be revived in accordance with subsection (a).11        (2) A consumer debt judgment entered on or after 12    January 1, 2020 through the date preceding the effective 13    date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 14    may be revived by filing a petition to revive the consumer 15    debt judgment no later than 10 years after its entry and by 16    serving the petition and entering a court order as 17    provided in this Section.18        (3) A consumer debt judgment entered on or after the 19    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 20    Assembly may not be revived but may be enforceable for a 21    period of 15 years after its entry.22    The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 23Assembly are declarative of existing law, except subdivision 24(a-10)(3). 25    (b) A petition to revive a judgment shall be filed in the 26original case in which the judgment was entered. The petition   SB1738 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1shall include a statement as to the original date and amount of 2the judgment, court costs expended, accrued interest, and 3credits to the judgment, if any.4    (c) Service of notice of the petition to revive a judgment 5shall be made in accordance with Supreme Court Rule 106.6    (d) An order reviving a judgment shall be for the original 7amount of the judgment. The plaintiff may recover interest and 8court costs from the date of the original judgment. Credits to 9the judgment shall be reflected by the plaintiff in 10supplemental proceedings or execution.11    (e) If a judgment debtor has filed for protection under 12the United States Bankruptcy Code and failed to successfully 13adjudicate and remove a lien filed by a judgment creditor, 14then the judgment may be revived only as to the property to 15which a lien attached before the filing of the bankruptcy 16action.17    (f) A judgment may be revived as to fewer than all judgment 18debtors, and such order for revival of judgment shall be 19final, appealable, and enforceable.20    (g) This Section does not apply to a child support 21judgment or to a judgment recovered in an action for damages 22for an injury described in Section 13-214.1, which need not be 23revived as provided in this Section and which may be enforced 24at any time as provided in Section 12-108.25    (h) If a judgment becomes dormant during the pendency of 26an enforcement proceeding against wages under Part 14 of this   SB1738 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1Article or under Article XII, the enforcement may continue to 2conclusion without revival of the underlying judgment so long 3as the enforcement is done under court supervision and 4includes a wage deduction order or turn over order and is 5against an employer, garnishee, or other third party 6respondent. 7(Source: P.A. 101-168, eff. 1-1-20.) 8    (735 ILCS 5/12-108)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-108)9    Sec. 12-108. Limitation on enforcement. 10    (a) Except as herein provided, no judgment shall be 11enforced after the expiration of 7 years from the time the same 12is rendered, except upon the revival of the same by a 13proceeding provided by Section 2-1601 of this Act; but real 14estate, levied upon within the 7 years, may be sold to enforce 15the judgment at any time within one year after the expiration 16of the 7 years. A judgment recovered in an action for damages 17for an injury described in Section 13-214.1 may be enforced at 18any time. Child support judgments, including those arising by 19operation of law, may be enforced at any time. Consumer debt 20judgments may be revived or enforced in accordance with 21subsection (a-10) of Section 2-1602. 22    (b) No judgment shall be enforced against a police officer 23employed by a municipality if the corporate authority of the 24municipality files with the clerk of the court in which the 25judgment was entered a statement certifying: (1) such police   SB1738 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1officer was employed by the municipality and was within the 2scope and course of his employment at the time of the 3occurrence giving rise to the action in which the judgment is 4entered and (2) the municipality indemnifies the police 5officer in the amount of the judgment and interest thereon. In 6such event, the judgment creditor may enforce the judgment 7against the municipality in the same manner and to the same 8extent as if the municipality were the judgment debtor.9    (c) If a judgment or a consumer debt judgment becomes 10dormant during the pendency of an enforcement proceeding 11against wages under of Part 14 of Article II or Part 8 of 12Article XII, the enforcement may continue to conclusion if the 13enforcement is done under court supervision and includes a 14wage deduction order or turn over order and is against an 15employer, garnishee, or other third party respondent.16(Source: P.A. 101-168, eff. 1-1-20.) 17    (735 ILCS 5/12-705)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-705)18    Sec. 12-705. Summons. 19    (a) Summons shall be returnable not less than 21 nor more 20than 40 days after the date of issuance. Summons with one copy 21of the interrogatories shall be served and returned as in 22other civil cases. If the garnishee is served with summons 23less than 10 days prior to the return date, the court shall 24continue the case to a new return date 14 days after the return 25date stated on the summons. The summons shall be in a form   SB1738 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1consistent with local court rules. The summons shall be 2accompanied by a copy of the underlying judgment or a 3certification by the clerk of the court that entered the 4judgment, or by the attorney for the judgment creditor, 5setting forth the amount of the judgment, that the judgment is 6a consumer debt judgment if it qualifies as a consumer debt 7judgment under paragraph (b)(1) of Section 2-1303, the name of 8the court and the number of the case and one copy of a 9garnishment notice in substantially the following form:10        "GARNISHMENT NOTICE11    (Name and address of Court) 12    Name of Case: (Name of Judgment Creditor), 13        Judgment Creditor v. 14        (Name of Judgment Debtor), 15        Judgment Debtor. 16    Address of Judgment Debtor: (Insert last known address) 17    Name and address of Attorney for Judgment 18    Creditor or of Judgment Creditor (If no 19    attorney is listed): (Insert name and address) 20    Amount of Judgment: $(Insert amount) 21    Name of Garnishee: (Insert name) 22    Return Date: (Insert return date specified in summons)23    NOTICE: The court has issued a garnishment summons against 24the garnishee named above for money or property (other than 25wages) belonging to the judgment debtor or in which the 26judgment debtor has an interest. The garnishment summons was   SB1738 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1issued on the basis of a judgment against the judgment debtor 2in favor of the judgment creditor in the amount stated above.3    The amount of money or property (other than wages) that 4may be garnished is limited by federal and Illinois law. The 5judgment debtor has the right to assert statutory exemptions 6against certain money or property of the judgment debtor which 7may not be used to satisfy the judgment in the amount stated 8above.9    Under Illinois or federal law, the exemptions of personal 10property owned by the debtor include the debtor's equity 11interest, not to exceed $4,000 in value, in any personal 12property as chosen by the debtor, of which $1,000 will be 13automatically applied to a debtor's bank, savings bank, or 14credit union account until the return date; Social Security 15and SSI benefits; public assistance benefits; unemployment 16compensation benefits; workers' compensation benefits; 17veterans' benefits; circuit breaker property tax relief 18benefits; the debtor's equity interest, not to exceed $3,600 19$2,400 in value, in any one motor vehicle, and the debtor's 20equity interest, not to exceed $2,250 $1,500 in value, in any 21implements, professional books or tools of the trade of the 22debtor.23    The judgment debtor may have other possible exemptions 24from garnishment under the law.25    The judgment debtor has the right to request a hearing 26before the court to dispute the garnishment or to declare   SB1738 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1exempt from garnishment certain money or property or both. To 2obtain a hearing in counties with a population of 1,000,000 or 3more, the judgment debtor must notify the Clerk of the Court in 4person and in writing at (insert address of Clerk) before the 5return date specified above or appear in court on the date and 6time on that return date. To obtain a hearing in counties with 7a population of less than 1,000,000, the judgment debtor must 8notify the Clerk of the Court in writing at (insert address of 9Clerk) on or before the return date specified above. The Clerk 10of the Court will provide a hearing date and the necessary 11forms that must be prepared by the judgment debtor or the 12attorney for the judgment debtor and sent to the judgment 13creditor and the garnishee regarding the time and location of 14the hearing. This notice may be sent by regular first class 15mail."16    (b) An officer or other person authorized by law to serve 17process shall serve the summons, interrogatories and the 18garnishment notice required by subsection (a) of this Section 19upon the garnishee and shall, (1) within 2 business days of the 20service upon the garnishee, mail a copy of the garnishment 21notice and the summons to the judgment debtor by first class 22mail at the judgment debtor's address indicated in the 23garnishment notice and (2) within 4 business days of the 24service upon the garnishee file with the clerk of the court a 25certificate of mailing in substantially the following form:26"CERTIFICATE OF MAILING  SB1738 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    I hereby certify that, within 2 business days of service 2upon the garnishee of the garnishment summons, interrogatories 3and garnishment notice, I served upon the judgment debtor in 4this cause a copy of the garnishment summons and garnishment 5notice by first class mail to the judgment debtor's address as 6indicated in the garnishment notice.7Date:............ ......................... 8                           Signature"9    In the case of service of the summons for garnishment upon 10the garnishee by certified or registered mail, as provided in 11subsection (c) of this Section, no sooner than 2 business days 12nor later than 4 business days after the date of mailing, the 13clerk shall mail a copy of the garnishment notice and the 14summons to the judgment debtor by first class mail at the 15judgment debtor's address indicated in the garnishment notice, 16shall prepare the Certificate of Mailing described by this 17subsection, and shall include the Certificate of Mailing in a 18permanent record.19    (c) In a county with a population of less than 1,000,000, 20unless otherwise provided by circuit court rule, at the 21request of the judgment creditor or his or her attorney and 22instead of personal service, service of a summons for 23garnishment may be made as follows:24        (1) For each garnishee to be served, the judgment 25    creditor or his or her attorney shall pay to the clerk of 26    the court a fee of $2, plus the cost of mailing, and   SB1738 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    furnish to the clerk an original and 2 copies of a summons, 2    an original and one copy of the interrogatories, an 3    affidavit setting forth the garnishee's mailing address, 4    an original and 2 copies of the garnishment notice 5    required by subsection (a) of this Section, and a copy of 6    the judgment or certification described in subsection (a) 7    of this Section. The original judgment shall be retained 8    by the clerk.9        (2) The clerk shall mail to the garnishee, at the 10    address appearing in the affidavit, the copy of the 11    judgment or certification described in subsection (a) of 12    this Section, the summons, the interrogatories, and the 13    garnishment notice required by subsection (a) of this 14    Section, by certified or registered mail, return receipt 15    requested, showing to whom delivered and the date and 16    address of delivery. This Mailing shall be mailed on a 17    "restricted delivery" basis when service is directed to a 18    natural person. The envelope and return receipt shall bear 19    the return address of the clerk, and the return receipt 20    shall be stamped with the docket number of the case. The 21    receipt for certified or registered mail shall state the 22    name and address of the addressee, the date of the 23    mailing, shall identify the documents mailed, and shall be 24    attached to the original summons.25        (3) The return receipt must be attached to the 26    original summons and, if it shows delivery at least 10   SB1738 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    days before the day for the return date, shall constitute 2    proof of service of any documents identified on the return 3    receipt as having been mailed.4        (4) The clerk shall note the fact of service in a 5    permanent record.6    (d) The garnishment summons may be served and returned in 7the manner provided by Supreme Court Rule for service, 8otherwise than by publication, of a notice for additional 9relief upon a party in default. 10(Source: P.A. 101-191, eff. 8-2-19.) 11    (735 ILCS 5/12-705.1 new)12    Sec. 12-705.1. Automatic exemption. When a consumer debt 13judgment, as defined in paragraph (b)(1) of Section 2-1303, 14has been entered against a judgment debtor, the debtor is 15entitled to a $1,000 automatic exemption, as defined in 16Section 12-1001.1. A garnishee's written answer shall set 17forth all the judgment debtor's personal property in its 18possession, even if it is not in excess of $1,000. 19    (735 ILCS 5/12-707)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-707)20    Sec. 12-707. Duties of garnishee. 21    (a) To the extent of the amount due upon the judgment and 22costs, the garnishee shall hold, subject to the order of the 23court any non-exempt indebtedness or other non-exempt property 24in his or her possession, custody or control belonging to the   SB1738 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1judgment debtor or in which the judgment debtor has any 2interest, subject to subsection (c) of Section 12-1001.1. The 3judgment or balance due thereon becomes a lien on the 4indebtedness and other property held by the garnishee at the 5time of the service of garnishment summons and remains a lien 6thereon pending the garnishment proceeding subject to 7subsection (c) of Section 12-1001.1.8    (b) The garnishee shall file, on or before the return 9date, or within the further time that the court for cause may 10allow, a written answer under oath to the interrogatories, 11setting forth as of the date of service of the garnishment 12summons any indebtedness due or to become due to the judgment 13debtor and any other property in his, her or its possession, 14custody or control belonging to the judgment debtor or in 15which the judgment debtor has an interest. The garnishee shall 16mail, by first class mail, a copy of the answer to the judgment 17creditor or its attorney and to the judgment debtor at the 18address specified in the affidavit filed under Section 12-701 19of this Act, or at any other address or location of the 20judgment debtor known to the garnishee, and shall certify in 21the answer that it was so mailed to the judgment debtor.22(Source: P.A. 87-1252.) 23    (735 ILCS 5/12-708)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-708)24    Sec. 12-708. Deductions and set-offs of garnishee. The 25garnishee is entitled to assert against the indebtedness due   SB1738 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1to the judgment debtor offsetting claims against either or 2both the judgment creditor and the judgment debtor, whether 3due at the time of service of the garnishment summons or 4thereafter to become due and whether liquidated or 5unliquidated, except claims for unliquidated damages for 6actions sounding in tort. To the extent that other property 7belonging to the judgment debtor or in which the judgment 8debtor has an interest is pledged to or held by the garnishee 9in good faith as security or that the garnishee has other just 10claim against the other property, the garnishee is entitled to 11retain the other property. The garnishee is liable for the 12balance of the indebtedness due to the judgment debtor after 13the offsetting claims are adjusted and for the balance of 14other property after deducting property to which the garnishee 15has just claim. The verdict or finding and judgment shall show 16the amount of offsetting claims or deductions allowed against 17each party. The rights of the garnishee in property belonging 18to the judgment debtor that is pledged to or held by the 19garnishee as security are not affected, impaired, or abridged 20by the automatic exemption defined in Section 12-1001.1. 21(Source: P.A. 83-707.) 22    (735 ILCS 5/12-901)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-901)23    Sec. 12-901. Amount. Every individual is entitled to an 24estate of homestead to the extent in value of $50,000 $15,000 25of his or her interest in a farm or lot of land and buildings   SB1738 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1thereon, a condominium, or personal property, owned or rightly 2possessed by lease or otherwise and occupied by him or her as a 3residence, or in a cooperative that owns property that the 4individual uses as a residence. That homestead and all right 5in and title to that homestead is exempt from attachment, 6judgment, levy, or judgment sale for the payment of his or her 7debts or other purposes and from the laws of conveyance, 8descent, and legacy, except as provided in this Code or in 9Section 20-6 of the Probate Act of 1975. This Section is not 10applicable between joint tenants or tenants in common but it 11is applicable as to any creditors of those persons. If 2 or 12more individuals own property that is exempt as a homestead, 13the value of the exemption of each individual may not exceed 14his or her proportionate share of $100,000 $30,000 based upon 15percentage of ownership.16(Source: P.A. 94-293, eff. 1-1-06.) 17    (735 ILCS 5/12-904)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-904)18    Sec. 12-904. Release, waiver or conveyance. No release, 19waiver or conveyance of the estate so exempted shall be valid, 20unless the same is in writing, signed by the individual and his 21or her spouse, if he or she have one, or possession is 22abandoned or given pursuant to the conveyance; or if the 23exception is continued to a child or children without the 24order of a court directing a release thereof; but if a 25conveyance is made by an individual as grantor to his or her   SB1738 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1spouse, such conveyance shall be effectual to pass the title 2expressed therein to be conveyed thereby, whether or not the 3grantor in such conveyance is joined therein by his or her 4spouse. In any case where such release, waiver or conveyance 5is taken by way of mortgage or security, the same shall only be 6operative as to such specific release, waiver or conveyance; 7and when the same includes different pieces of land, or the 8homestead is of greater value than $50,000 for an individual 9owner or $100,000 for 2 or more individual owners $15,000, the 10other lands shall first be sold before resorting to the 11homestead, and in case of the sale of such homestead, if any 12balance remains after the payment of the debt and costs, such 13balance shall, to the extent of $50,000 for an individual 14owner or $100,000 for 2 or more individual owners $15,000 be 15exempt, and be applied upon such homestead exemption in the 16manner provided by law.17(Source: P.A. 94-293, eff. 1-1-06.) 18    (735 ILCS 5/12-906)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-906)19    Sec. 12-906. Proceeds of sale. When a homestead is 20conveyed by the owner thereof, such conveyance shall not 21subject the premises to any lien or incumbrance to which it 22would not be subject in the possession of such owner; and the 23proceeds thereof, to the extent of the amount of $50,000 for 24premises owned by an individual owner or $100,000 for premises 25owned by 2 or more individual owners $15,000, shall be exempt   SB1738 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1from judgment or other process, for one year after the receipt 2thereof, by the person entitled to the exemption, and if 3reinvested in a homestead the same shall be entitled to the 4same exemption as the original homestead.5(Source: P.A. 94-293, eff. 1-1-06.) 6    (735 ILCS 5/12-909)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-909)7    Sec. 12-909. Bid for less than exempted amount. No sale 8shall be made of the premises on such judgment unless a greater 9sum than $50,000 for premises owned by an individual owner or 10$100,000 for premises owned by 2 or more individual owners 11$15,000 is bid therefor. If a greater sum is not so bid, the 12judgment may be set aside or modified, or the enforcement of 13the judgment released, as for lack of property.14(Source: P.A. 94-293, eff. 1-1-06.) 15    (735 ILCS 5/12-910)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-910)16    Sec. 12-910. Proceedings to enforce judgment. If in the 17opinion of the judgment creditors, or the officer holding a 18certified copy of a judgment for enforcement against such 19individuals, the premises claimed by him or her as exempt are 20worth more than $50,000 for premises owned by an individual 21owner or $100,000 for premises owned by 2 or more individual 22owners $15,000, such officer shall summon 3 individuals, as 23commissioners, who shall, upon oath, to be administered to 24them by the officer, appraise the premises, and if, in their   SB1738 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1opinion, the property may be divided without damage to the 2interest of the parties, they shall set off so much of the 3premises, including the dwelling house, as in their opinion is 4worth $50,000 for premises owned by an individual owner or 5$100,000 for premises owned by 2 or more individual owners 6$15,000, and the residue of the premises may be advertised and 7sold by such officer. Each commissioner shall receive for his 8or her services the sum of $5 per day for each day necessarily 9engaged in such service. The officer summoning such 10commissioners shall receive such fees as may be allowed for 11serving summons, but shall be entitled to charge mileage for 12only the actual distance traveled from the premises to be 13appraised, to the residence of the commissioners summoned. The 14officer shall not be required to summon commissioners until 15the judgment creditor, or some one for him or her, shall 16advance to the officer one day's fees for the commissioners, 17and unless the creditor shall advance such fees the officer 18shall not be required to enforce the judgment. The costs of 19such appraisement shall not be taxed against the judgment 20debtor unless such appraisement shows that the judgment debtor 21has property subject to such judgment.22(Source: P.A. 94-293, eff. 1-1-06.) 23    (735 ILCS 5/12-911)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-911)24    Sec. 12-911. Notice to judgment debtor. In case the value 25of the premises is, in the opinion of the commissioners, more   SB1738 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1than $50,000 for premises owned by an individual owner or 2$100,000 for premises owned by 2 or more individual owners 3$15,000, and cannot be divided as is provided for in Section 412-910 of this Act, they shall make and sign an appraisal of 5the value thereof, and deliver the same to the officer, who 6shall deliver a copy thereof to the judgment debtor, or to some 7one of the family of the age of 13 years or upwards, with a 8notice thereto attached that unless the judgment debtor pays 9to such officer the surplus over and above $50,000 for 10premises owned by an individual owner or $100,000 for premises 11owned by 2 or more individual owners $15,000 on the amount due 12on the judgment within 60 days thereafter, such premises will 13be sold.14(Source: P.A. 94-293, eff. 1-1-06.) 15    (735 ILCS 5/12-912)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-912)16    Sec. 12-912. Sale of premises - Distribution of proceeds. 17In case of such surplus, or the amount due on the judgment is 18not paid within the 60 days, the officer may advertise and sell 19the premises, and out of the proceeds of such sale pay to such 20judgment debtor the sum of $50,000 for premises owned by an 21individual owner or $100,000 for premises owned by 2 or more 22individual owners $15,000, and apply the balance on the 23judgment.24(Source: P.A. 94-293, eff. 1-1-06.)   SB1738 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    (735 ILCS 5/12-1001)  (from Ch. 110, par. 12-1001)2    Sec. 12-1001. Personal property exempt. The following 3personal property, owned by the debtor, is exempt from 4judgment, attachment, or distress for rent:5        (a) All household goods, including but not limited to, 6    the debtor's and the debtor's dependents' food, eating and 7    cooking utensils, bedding, furniture, books, refrigerator, 8    stove, microwave oven, kitchen appliances, necessary 9    provisions, washing machine, clothes dryer, vacuum 10    cleaner, yard equipment and household equipment and tools, 11    all personal possessions, including, but not limited to, 12    clothing, pets, personal health aids, medications, 13    computers or similar electronic devices and telephones, 14    except that a creditor may obtain court permission to levy 15    on any item of furniture, appliance, electronic device, 16    yard equipment, precious item, utensils, set of utensils, 17    or any other item exempt under this subsection that has a 18    resale value of more than $5,000 unless that item is 19    exempt under another provision of this Section. The debtor 20    may exempt one piece of jewelry up to a value of $5,000 The 21    necessary wearing apparel, bible, school books, and family 22    pictures of the debtor and the debtor's dependents;23        (b) The debtor's equity interest, not to exceed $4,000 24    in value, of which $1,000 is an automatic exemption 25    pursuant to Section 12-1001.1, in any other property;26        (c) The debtor's interest, not to exceed $3,600 $2,400   SB1738 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    in value, in any one motor vehicle;2        (d) The debtor's equity interest, not to exceed $2,250 3    $1,500 in value, in any implements, professional books, or 4    tools of the trade of the debtor;5        (e) Professionally prescribed health aids for the 6    debtor or a dependent of the debtor;7        (f) All proceeds payable because of the death of the 8    insured and the aggregate net cash value of any or all life 9    insurance and endowment policies and annuity contracts 10    payable to a wife or husband of the insured, or to a child, 11    parent, or other person dependent upon the insured, or to 12    a revocable or irrevocable trust which names the wife or 13    husband of the insured or which names a child, parent, or 14    other person dependent upon the insured as the primary 15    beneficiary of the trust, whether the power to change the 16    beneficiary is reserved to the insured or not and whether 17    the insured or the insured's estate is a contingent 18    beneficiary or not;19        (g) The debtor's right to receive:20            (1) a social security benefit, unemployment 21        compensation, or public assistance benefit;22            (2) a veteran's benefit;23            (3) a disability, illness, or unemployment 24        benefit; and25            (4) alimony, support, or separate maintenance, to 26        the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the   SB1738 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1        debtor and any dependent of the debtor.2        (h) The debtor's right to receive, or property that is 3    traceable to:4            (1) an award under a crime victim's reparation 5        law;6            (2) a payment on account of the wrongful death of 7        an individual of whom the debtor was a dependent, to 8        the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the 9        debtor;10            (3) a payment under a life insurance contract that 11        insured the life of an individual of whom the debtor 12        was a dependent, to the extent reasonably necessary 13        for the support of the debtor or a dependent of the 14        debtor;15            (4) a payment, not to exceed $22,500 $15,000 in 16        value, on account of personal bodily injury of the 17        debtor or an individual of whom the debtor was a 18        dependent; and19            (5) any restitution payments made to persons 20        pursuant to the federal Civil Liberties Act of 1988 21        and the Aleutian and Pribilof Island Restitution Act, 22        P.L. 100-383.23        For purposes of this subsection (h), a debtor's right 24    to receive an award or payment shall be exempt for a 25    maximum of 2 years after the debtor's right to receive the 26    award or payment accrues; property traceable to an award   SB1738 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    or payment shall be exempt for a maximum of 5 years after 2    the award or payment accrues; and an award or payment and 3    property traceable to an award or payment shall be exempt 4    only to the extent of the amount of the award or payment, 5    without interest or appreciation from the date of the 6    award or payment.7        (i) The debtor's right to receive an award under Part 8    20 of Article II of this Code relating to crime victims' 9    awards.10        (j) Moneys held in an account invested in the Illinois 11    College Savings Pool of which the debtor is a participant 12    or donor and funds invested in an ABLE Account as defined 13    by Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, except the 14    following non-exempt contributions:15            (1) any contribution to such account by the debtor 16        as participant or donor that is made with the actual 17        intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditor of 18        the debtor;19            (2) any contributions to such account by the 20        debtor as participant during the 365 day period prior 21        to the date of filing of the debtor's petition for 22        bankruptcy that, in the aggregate during such period, 23        exceed the amount of the annual gift tax exclusion 24        under Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 25        1986, as amended, in effect at the time of 26        contribution; or  SB1738 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1            (3) any contributions to such account by the 2        debtor as participant during the period commencing 730 3        days prior to and ending 366 days prior to the date of 4        filing of the debtor's petition for bankruptcy that, 5        in the aggregate during such period, exceed the amount 6        of the annual gift tax exclusion under Section 2503(b) 7        of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in 8        effect at the time of contribution.9        For purposes of this subsection (j), "account" 10    includes all accounts for a particular designated 11    beneficiary, of which the debtor is a participant or 12    donor. 13    Money due the debtor from the sale of any personal 14property that was exempt from judgment, attachment, or 15distress for rent at the time of the sale is exempt from 16attachment and garnishment to the same extent that the 17property would be exempt had the same not been sold by the 18debtor.19    If a debtor owns property exempt under this Section and he 20or she purchased that property with the intent of converting 21nonexempt property into exempt property or in fraud of his or 22her creditors, that property shall not be exempt from 23judgment, attachment, or distress for rent. Property acquired 24within 6 months of the filing of the petition for bankruptcy 25shall be presumed to have been acquired in contemplation of 26bankruptcy.  SB1738 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    The personal property exemptions set forth in this Section 2shall apply only to individuals and only to personal property 3that is used for personal rather than business purposes. The 4personal property exemptions set forth in this Section shall 5not apply to or be allowed against any money, salary, or wages 6due or to become due to the debtor that are required to be 7withheld in a wage deduction proceeding under Part 8 of this 8Article XII.9(Source: P.A. 100-922, eff. 1-1-19.) 10    (735 ILCS 5/12-1001.1 new)11    Sec. 12-1001.1. Automatic exemption.12    (a) "Automatic exemption" means the right of a judgment 13debtor, against whom a consumer debt judgment as defined in 14paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 2-1303 has been 15entered on or after January 1, 2020, to receive $1,000 of the 16judgment debtor's equity interest in personal property held in 17a checking or savings deposit account by a third party 18citation respondent or garnishee immediately upon entry of the 19consumer debt judgment and before the entry of an order of the 20court (i) confirming the judgment debtor's personal property 21exemption in that sum of money, or (ii) otherwise directing 22the turnover of the funds to the judgment creditor. The 23automatic exemption is part of the judgment debtor's equity 24interest, not to exceed $4,000 in value, in any property under 25subsection (b) of Section 12-1001.  SB1738 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1    (b) The judgment debtor's right to receive the automatic 2exemption expires on the return date, and the unspent portion 3of the automatic exemption shall be subject to the entry of an 4order by the court directing its turnover to the judgment 5creditor to be applied towards satisfaction of the judgment.6    (c) The lien imposed by subsection (m) of Section 2-1402 7with respect to a citation or subsection (a) of Section 12-707 8with respect to a garnishment shall not apply to the automatic 9exemption prior to the return date.10    (d) A third party citation respondent shall exclude the 11amount of the automatic exemption when withholding the payment 12of moneys sought to be enforced by the judgment creditor 13pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of Section 2-1402.14    (e) If a third party citation respondent or garnishee is 15ordered to turn over funds of the judgment debtor held in a 16checking or savings deposit account in its possession, it 17shall not be obligated to turn over funds in excess of the 18amount it is holding on the date that it processes the turnover 19order, irrespective of the account balance on the date of the 20judgment, the date of its answers to the citation or 21garnishment, or the return date. The turnover order shall 22operate to serve as a dismissal of the citation or garnishment 23and release of the judgment against the third party citation 24respondent or garnishee, upon the receipt of the turnover 25funds by the judgment creditor or its attorney.26    (f) If the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor's   SB1738 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1attorney does not appear on the return date to claim the 2judgment debtor's equity interest, not to exceed $4,000, in 3any personal property held by the third party citation 4respondent or garnishee, the court may enter an order 5directing the turnover of the funds, including the automatic 6exemption or any remaining portion thereof, to the judgment 7creditor.  8    (735 ILCS 5/13-218)  (from Ch. 110, par. 13-218)9    Sec. 13-218. Revival of judgment. A petition to revive a 10judgment, as provided by Section 2-1601 of this Code, may be 11filed no later than 20 years next after the date of entry of 12such judgment. The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 1396th General Assembly are declarative of existing law. This 14Section does not apply to consumer debt judgments that are 15subject to the standards and procedures set forth in 16subsection (a-10) of 2-1602. 17(Source: P.A. 96-305, eff. 8-11-09.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 191, 2026.  SB1738 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 08986 JRC 19042 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    705 ILCS 105/27.1b4    735 ILCS 5/2-1402from Ch. 110, par. 2-14025    735 ILCS 5/2-1402.1 new6    735 ILCS 5/2-16027    735 ILCS 5/12-108from Ch. 110, par. 12-1088    735 ILCS 5/12-705from Ch. 110, par. 12-7059    735 ILCS 5/12-705.1 new10    735 ILCS 5/12-707from Ch. 110, par. 12-70711    735 ILCS 5/12-708from Ch. 110, par. 12-70812    735 ILCS 5/12-901from Ch. 110, par. 12-90113    735 ILCS 5/12-904from Ch. 110, par. 12-90414    735 ILCS 5/12-906from Ch. 110, par. 12-90615    735 ILCS 5/12-909from Ch. 110, par. 12-90916    735 ILCS 5/12-910from Ch. 110, par. 12-91017    735 ILCS 5/12-911from Ch. 110, par. 12-91118    735 ILCS 5/12-912from Ch. 110, par. 12-91219    735 ILCS 5/12-1001from Ch. 110, par. 12-100120    735 ILCS 5/12-1001.1 new21    735 ILCS 5/13-218from Ch. 110, par. 13-218